Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-548
Class I school district; change to six-member board; percentage of vote required; election; change back to three-member board; board members; election; teachers; qualifications.

The legal voters of a Class I school district having a school census of more than one hundred fifty persons may, at an annual or special meeting by a favorable vote of fifty-five percent of the persons in attendance and voting, change to a six-member school board. The district shall continue to have a six-member board until fifty-five percent of the persons in attendance and voting at an annual or special meeting vote to change to a three-member board. Board members of a six-member board shall be elected as provided in section 32-541 or as provided for in subsection (3) of section 79-565. All teachers elected by such a district must meet the same qualifications as do the teachers in Class II districts.

Laws 1951, c. 276, § 10, p. 932;

Laws 1957, c. 351, § 2, p. 1197;

Laws 1961, c. 403, § 1, p. 1220;

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 598;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-601.01;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 301;

Laws 1997, LB 345, § 22.